Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1921
Examiner's licenses; fees; expiration.

The fee for all initial examiner's licenses shall be fifty dollars. The license shall expire on December 31 following its issuance. An examiner's license may be renewed from year to year upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars. Additional provisions for licenses may be provided for by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the secretary. The secretary shall remit the fees received pursuant to this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 21;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 73;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 33.
July 1, 2021